Utah statutes.
73-18a-8.   Public marinas -- Duty to maintain waste disposal facilities.
The owner or whoever is lawfully vested with the possession, management, or
control of a public marina or other public waterside facility used by a vessel
for launching, docking, mooring, and related purposes shall be required to
have, and properly maintain, waste receptacles or similar devices of proper
design for the depositing of waste, litter, and human body waste, as required
at locations where they can be conveniently used by a vessel's occupants.
Waterside toilet facilities may be required if their absence contributes to or
creates unsightliness or a hazard to the public health and welfare.
